Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,100
Department of Health and Human Services; acceptance of juveniles for observation and treatment; authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services may receive any juvenile for observation and treatment from any public institution other than a state institution or from any private or charitable institution or person having legal custody thereof upon such terms as such department may deem proper.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 56;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 147.